Hawaii statutes.
[§353G-8] Report on progress in treatment
programs and compliance with conditions. (a) If a person has been ordered
to participate in a treatment program, the designated treatment program shall
report periodically on the person's progress in the treatment program to the
agency responsible for monitoring the person's compliance with the terms and
conditions of parole or other release from a correctional center or facility.

(b) A designated treatment program shall
promptly notify the agency responsible for monitoring the person's compliance
with the terms and conditions of parole or other release from a correctional
center or facility if the person:

(1) Fails to comply with program rules and treatment
expectations;

(2) Refuses to engage constructively in the treatment
process; or

(3) Terminates participation in the treatment
program.

Upon this notification, the agency responsible for
monitoring the person's compliance shall promptly report the person's actions
to the appropriate authority. [L 1998, c 152, pt of §2]

Revision Note

In subsection (b)(1), "or" deleted pursuant to
§23G-15.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next